Wisconsin, session 2025, AB994.
do enact as follows:AB994,11Section 1. 35.93 (2) (b) 3. gm. of the statutes is amended to read:AB994,2,3235.93 (2) (b) 3. gm. Petitions and proposed rules submitted under s. 227.26 (4) 3(b) 1. 227.263 (1) (a).AB994,24Section 2. 35.93 (2) (b) 7. of the statutes is created to read:AB994,2,5535.93 (2) (b) 7. Reports from agencies under s. 227.29 (1g) (d).AB994,31Section 3. 227.111 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 227.111 (1) (intro.) and 2amended to read:AB994,3,43227.111 (1) (intro.) In this section, “restricted agency” means an all of the 4following:AB994,3,85(b) An affiliated credentialing board, as defined in s. 15.01 (1g), a board, as 6defined in s. 15.01 (1r), a commission, as defined in s. 15.01 (2), or an examining 7board, as defined in s. 15.01 (7), that has not taken any action under this 8subchapter with respect to the promulgation of a rule in 10 years or more.AB994,49Section 4. 227.111 (1) (a) of the statutes is created to read:AB994,3,1110227.111 (1) (a) An agency that is delinquent in complying with the 11requirements under s. 227.29 (1g).AB994,512Section 5. 227.111 (2) of the statutes is renumbered 227.111 (2) (b) and 13amended to read:AB994,3,1814227.111 (2) (b) Notwithstanding ss. 227.10 and 227.11 and any other 15provision authorizing or requiring a restricted agency to promulgate rules, 16including par. (a), a restricted agency described in sub. (1) (b) may not take any 17action with respect to the promulgation of a rule unless a subsequent law 18specifically authorizes such action.AB994,619Section 6. 227.111 (2) (a) of the statutes is created to read:AB994,3,2420227.111 (2) (a) Notwithstanding ss. 227.10 and 227.11 and any other 21provision authorizing or requiring a restricted agency to promulgate rules, a 22restricted agency described in sub. (1) (a) may not take any action with respect to 23the promulgation of a rule until the agency submits its delinquent report under s. 24227.29 (1g).AB994,71Section 7. 227.135 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB994,4,222227.135 (2) An agency that has prepared a statement of the scope of the 3proposed rule shall present the statement to the department of administration, 4which shall make a determination as to whether the agency has the explicit 5authority to promulgate the rule as proposed in the statement of scope and shall 6report the statement of scope and its determination to the governor who, in his or 7her discretion, may approve or reject the statement of scope. The agency may not 8send the statement to the legislative reference bureau for publication under sub. (3) 9until the governor issues a written notice of approval of the statement. The agency 10shall also present the statement to the individual or body with policy-making 11powers over the subject matter of the proposed rule for approval. The individual or 12body with policy-making powers may not approve the statement until at least 10 13days after publication of the statement under sub. (3) and, if a preliminary public 14hearing and comment period are held by the agency under s. 227.136, until the 15individual or body has received and reviewed any public comments and feedback 16received from the agency under s. 227.136 (5). No state employee or official may 17perform any activity in connection with the drafting of a proposed rule, except for 18an activity necessary to prepare the statement of the scope of the proposed rule 19until the governor and the individual or body with policy-making powers over the 20subject matter of the proposed rule approve the statement. This subsection does 21not prohibit an agency from performing an activity necessary to prepare a petition 22and proposed rule for submission under s. 227.26 (4) 227.263.AB994,823Section 8. 227.26 (4) (title) of the statutes is repealed.AB994,924Section 9. 227.26 (4) (a) of the statutes is repealed.AB994,101Section 10. 227.26 (4) (b) of the statutes is renumbered 227.263 (1), and 2227.263 (1) (intro.), (a), (b) and (c) (intro.), 1. and 3. as renumbered, are amended to 3read:AB994,5,94227.263 (1) (intro.) Notwithstanding ss. 227.114 to 227.117 and 227.135 to 5227.19, an agency that promulgated or that otherwise administers a rule that the 6agency determines is an unauthorized rule shall may petition the joint committee 7for review of administrative rules for authorization to repeal that a rule that the 8agency has determined in its report submitted under s. 227.19 (1g) (d) to be a 9qualifying rule, as defined under s. 227.29 (1c), by using the following process:AB994,5,1910(a) The agency shall submit a petition with a proposed rule that repeals the 11rule the agency has determined is an unauthorized rule to the legislative council 12staff for review. The proposed rule shall be in the form required under s. 227.14 (1) 13and shall include the material required under s. 227.14 (2) (a) 1., 2., and 7. and a 14statement that the agency is petitioning the joint committee for review of 15administrative rules to use the process under this subsection section to repeal a 16rule that the agency has determined to be an unauthorized rule a qualifying rule, 17as defined under s. 227.29 (1c). The agency shall also send an electronic copy of the 18petition and the proposed rule to the legislative reference bureau, in a format 19approved by the legislative reference bureau, for publication in the register.AB994,6,320(b) The legislative council staff shall review the petition and proposed rule in 21accordance with s. 227.15 (2) and submit to the joint committee for review of 22administrative rules the petition and proposed rule with a written report including 23a statement of its determination as to whether the proposed rule proposes to repeal 24an unauthorized rule to be repealed is a qualifying rule, as defined under s. 227.29 1(1c). The legislative council staff shall send the agency a copy of its report with an 2indication of the date on which the petition and proposed rule were submitted to the 3committee.AB994,6,74(c) (intro.) Following receipt of the petition and proposed rule submitted by 5the legislative council staff under subd. 2. par. (b), the joint committee for review of 6administrative rules shall review the petition and proposed rule and may do any of 7the following:AB994,6,1081. Approve the agency’s petition if the committee determines that the 9proposed rule would repeal an unauthorized a qualifying rule, as defined under s. 10227.29 (1c).AB994,6,12113. Request that the agency make changes to the proposed rule and resubmit 12the petition and proposed rule under subd. 1 par. (a).AB994,1113Section 11. 227.26 (4) (c) of the statutes is renumbered 227.263 (2) and 14amended to read:AB994,6,1915227.263 (2) If the joint committee for review of administrative rules approves 16a petition to repeal an unauthorized a rule as provided in par. (b) 3. a. under sub. (1) 17(c) 1., the agency shall promulgate the proposed rule by filing a certified copy of the 18rule with the legislative reference bureau under s. 227.20, together with a copy of 19the committee’s decision.AB994,1220Section 12. 227.263 (title) of the statutes is created to read:AB994,6,2121227.263 (title) Expedited rule-making process.AB994,1322Section 13. 227.29 (1) (intro.) of the statutes is renumbered 227.29 (1g) 23(intro.) and amended to read:AB994,7,224227.29 (1g) (intro.) By March 31 of each odd-numbered year, each agency with 1any rules published in the code shall submit a report to the joint committee for 2review of administrative rules listing all of the following do all of the following:AB994,7,43(a) Review those rules promulgated or otherwise administered by that agency: 4and identify those rules that the agency determines may be qualifying rules.AB994,145Section 14. 227.29 (1) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 227.29 (1c) (a) and 6amended to read:AB994,7,107227.29 (1c) (a) Unauthorized rules, as defined in s. 227.26 (4) (a) Rules that 8the agency lacks the authority to promulgate due to the repeal or amendment of the 9laws that previously authorized their promulgation, together with a description of 10the legislation that eliminated the agency’s authority to promulgate any such rule.AB994,1511Section 15. 227.29 (1) (b) to (e) of the statutes are renumbered 227.29 (1c) (b) 12to (e). Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab994 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab994 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB994 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB994 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB994: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting